Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Chapter 20. Alaska Employment Security Act.

Cross references. —

For provisions temporarily suspending or amending certain provisions of this chapter beginning March 1, 2020 during the state or national emergency resulting from the novel coronavirus disease (COVID-19) outbreak, see secs. 1 and 2, ch. 4, SLA 2020, in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.